Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 3. Common Areas and Facilities Owned With Apartments.

Sec. 34.07.160.
Common areas and facilities ownership.

Each apartment owner has the common right to a share, with other apartment owners, in the common areas and facilities.

Each apartment owner is entitled to an undivided interest in the common areas and facilities in the percentage expressed in the declaration. The percentage is computed by taking as a basis the value of the apartment in relation to the value of the property.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.170.
Nonexclusive easement to use common areas and facilities.

Each apartment owner has a nonexclusive easement for, and may use the common areas and facilities in accordance with the purpose for which they were intended without hindering or encroaching upon the lawful right of the other apartment owners.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.180.
Alteration of common areas and facilities ownership.

The percentage of the undivided interest of each apartment owner in the common areas and facilities as expressed in the declaration may not be altered except in accordance with procedures set out in the bylaws and by amending the declaration.

The bylaws must provide for a periodic reappraisal of the apartments and the common areas and facilities together with a recomputation, if required, of the percentage of the undivided interest of each apartment owner in the common areas and facilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.190.
Partition of common areas and facilities ownership prohibited.

The common areas and facilities shall remain undivided and an apartment owner or other person may not bring an action for partition or division of any part, unless the property has been removed from the provisions of this chapter under AS

34.07.300

—

34.07.340

. Any covenant to the contrary is void.

Nothing in this chapter limits the right of partition by a husband and wife owning as tenants by the entirety or by the owners in common of one or more of the apartments as to the ownership of the apartment or apartments.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.200.
Maintenance, repair, and replacement of common areas and facilities.

The necessary work of maintenance, repair, and replacement of the common areas and facilities and the making of an addition or improvement may be carried out only as provided in this chapter and in the bylaws.

The association of apartment owners has the irrevocable right, to be exercised by the manager or board of directors, to have access to each apartment from time to time during reasonable hours as may be necessary for

the maintenance, repair, or replacement of any of the common areas and facilities in it, or accessible from it; or

making emergency repairs in the apartment necessary to prevent damage to the common areas and facilities or to another apartment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.210.
Waiver of liability for share of common expenses prohibited.

Waiver by an apartment owner of the use or enjoyment of any of the common areas and facilities or abandonment of the apartment does not exempt the owner from liability for contribution towards the common expenses of common areas or facilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.220.
Collection of unpaid common expenses from apartment owner.

A sum assessed by the association of apartment owners but unpaid for the share of the common expenses chargeable to any apartment may be enforced by the manager or board of directors acting on behalf of the apartment owners, upon first obtaining the approval of a majority of all apartment owners, in the following manner:

10 days’ notice shall be given the delinquent apartment owner stating that unless the assessment is paid within 10 days any or all utility services will be immediately severed and shall remain severed until the assessment is paid; or

by the lawful method of enforcement as may be provided in the declaration or bylaws.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.230.
Unpaid common expense is lien on apartment; order of lien priority.

A sum assessed by the association of apartment owners but unpaid for the share of the common expenses chargeable to an apartment constitutes a lien on the apartment prior to all other liens except

tax liens on the apartment in favor of an assessing unit or special district; and

sums unpaid on deeds of trust or mortgages of record.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.240.
Common expense lien foreclosure.

A common expense lien under AS

34.07.230

may be foreclosed in a civil action brought by the manager or board of directors, acting on behalf of the apartment owners, in the same manner as a lien on, or mortgage of or a deed or trust of real property.

In the event of foreclosure, the apartment owner shall be required to pay a reasonable rental for the apartment, if provided for in the bylaws, and the plaintiff in the foreclosure may appoint a receiver to collect it.

The manager or board of directors, acting on behalf of the apartment owners may, unless prohibited by the declaration, bid in the apartment at the foreclosure sale, and may acquire and hold, lease, mortgage, and convey the apartment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.250.
Action to recover a judgment for unpaid common expenses does not waive lien.

An action to recover a judgment for unpaid common expenses is maintainable without foreclosing or waiving the lien securing it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.260.
Causes of action relating to common areas and facilities.

Without limiting the rights of an apartment owner, a cause of action may be brought by the manager or board of directors, in either case in the discretion of the board of directors, on behalf of two or more apartment owners, as their respective interests may appear, with respect to a cause of action relating to the common areas and facilities of more than one apartment.

A cause of action relating to the common areas and facilities for damages arising out of tortious conduct may be maintained only against the association of apartment owners and a judgment lien or other charge is a common expense. The judgment lien or charge is removed from an apartment and its percentage of undivided interest in the common areas and facilities upon payment by the respective owner of the proportionate share based on the percentage of undivided interest owned by that owner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Collateral references. —

Personal liability of owner of condominium unit to one sustaining personal injury or property damage by condition of common areas. 39 ALR4th 98.

Association’s liability to unit owner for injuries caused by third person’s criminal conduct. 59 ALR4th 489.

Standing to bring action relating to real property of condominium. 74 ALR4th 165.

Sec. 34.07.270.
Service of process on two or more apartment owners.

Service of process on two or more apartment owners in an action relating to the common areas and facilities of more than one apartment may be made on the person designated in the declaration to receive service of process.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.280.
Receipts and expenditures records to be kept.

The manager or board of directors shall keep detailed and accurate records in chronological order of the receipts and expenditures affecting the common areas and facilities, specifying and itemizing the maintenance and repair expenses of the common areas and facilities and any other expenses incurred.

All books and records shall be kept in accordance with good accounting procedures.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 1994)

Sec. 34.07.290.
Examination by apartment owner of receipts and expenditures.

The receipts and expenditures records and vouchers authorizing payment for maintenance and repair of common areas and facilities required to be kept by AS

34.07.280

shall be available for examination by an apartment owner at convenient hours of weekdays.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)